District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.10a

Fund balance requirements of principal campaign committees.

Within the limitations specified in this chapter, any surplus, residual, or unexpended campaign funds received by or on behalf of an individual who seeks nomination for election, or election to office, shall be:

(1)

Contributed to a political party for political purposes;

(2)

Used to retire the proper debts of his or her political committee that received the funds;

(3)

Transferred to a political committee, a charitable organization in accordance with § 47-1803.03(a)(8), or, in the case of an elected official, an established constituent services fund; or

(4)

Returned to the donors as follows:

(A)

In the case of an individual defeated in an election, within 6 months following the election;

(B)

In the case of an individual elected to office, within 6 months following the election; and

(C)

In the case of an individual ceasing to be a candidate, within 6 months thereafter.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 310a
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1072(c), 59 DCR 8025
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.
For temporary addition of section, see § 1072(c) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary addition of section, see § 1072(c) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).